Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4096.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; diminution in property values; intent A. The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in the following fiscal years to the state treasurer to hold indefinitely to distribute to eligible claimants or property owners that own property in the city of Phoenix for damages from claims filed pursuant to section 12-1134, Arizona Revised Statutes, resulting from the diminution in property values due to implementation of zoning ordinances and other actions adopted by the city of Phoenix: 1. $333,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027. 2. $333,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028. 3. $333,000,000 in fiscal year 2028-2029. B. A claimant or property owner is eligible to receive a distribution from the monies appropriated in subsection A of this section if the claimant or property owner presents to the state treasurer proof of a successful claim, settlement or judgment with the city of Phoenix.  Distributions made pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be in lieu of payments or distributions made directly by the city of Phoenix. C. The legislature intends that the state shared revenues to the city of Phoenix appropriated in the general appropriations act for each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 be reduced by $333,000,000. The reduction for each fiscal year shall first be reduced from urban shared revenues and then from state transaction privilege tax revenues.